California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(3) The zero-carbon resource or eligible renewable energy resource shall be located within California.

(4) The retail
 seller or local publicly owned electric utility shall require its contractors to use a multicraft project labor agreement, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code, for construction of the zero-carbon resource or eligible renewable energy resource. The project labor agreement shall conform to the industry standard agreements recently used for other similar private projects, including side letters for high-voltage transmission and related work.

(5) The retail seller or local publicly owned electric utility shall exclude the retail sales to a state agency customer from any compliance obligations relating to zero-carbon resources or eligible renewable resources, including, but not limited to, obligations pursuant to Section 399.25 or 399.30.

(6) Any renewable energy credits or environmental attributes associated with incremental
 procurement pursuant to this section shall be retired on behalf of the state agency customer and shall not be further sold, transferred, or otherwise monetized for any purpose.

(e) Zero-carbon resource or eligible renewable energy resource procurement commitments made on behalf of a state agency shall give preference to resource options expected to yield maximum long-term employment, stimulate new economic activity, generate local and state tax revenues, and assist with the development of new industries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 361, Sec. 5.   (SB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

454.6.

(a) A contract entered into pursuant to Section 454.5 by an electrical corporation for the electricity generated by a replacement or repowering project that meets the criteria specified in subdivision (b) shall be recoverable in rates, taking into account any collateral requirements and debt equivalence associated with the contract, in a manner determined by the commission to provide the best value to ratepayers.

(b) To be eligible for rate treatment in accordance with subdivision
 (a), a contract shall be for a project which meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The project is a replacement or repowering of an existing generation unit of a thermal powerplant.

(2) The project complies with all applicable requirements of federal, state, and local laws.

(3) The project will not require significant additional rights-of-way for electrical or fuel-related transmission facilities.

(4) The project will result in significant and substantial increases in the efficiency of the production of electricity.

(5) The Independent System Operator or local system operator certifies that the project is needed for local area reliability.

(6) The project provides electricity to consumers of this state at the cost of generating that electricity, including a reasonable return on the investment and the costs of financing the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 374, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

454.7.

The commission shall, to the extent permitted by federal law and consistent with Section 2771, provide cogeneration technology projects with the highest possible priority for the purchase of natural gas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 922.)
-------------------------------------------

454.8.

In any decision establishing rates for an electrical or gas corporation reflecting the reasonable and prudent costs of the new construction of any addition to or extension of the corporation’s plant, when the commission has found and determined that the addition or extension is used and useful, the commission shall consider a method for the recovery of these costs which would be constant in real economic terms over the useful life of the facilities, so that ratepayers in a given year will not pay for the benefits received in other years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 926, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

454.9.

(a) The commission shall authorize public utilities to establish catastrophic event memorandum accounts and to record in those accounts the costs of the following:

(1) Restoring utility services to customers.

(2) Repairing, replacing, or restoring damaged utility facilities.

(3) Complying with governmental agency orders in connection with events declared
 disasters by competent state or federal authorities.

(b) The costs, including capital costs, recorded in the accounts set forth in subdivision (a) shall be recoverable in rates following a request by the affected utility, a commission finding of their reasonableness, and approval by the commission. The commission shall hold expedited proceedings in response to utility applications to recover costs associated with catastrophic events.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1156, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

455.

Whenever any schedule stating an individual or joint rate, classification, contract, practice, or rule, not increasing or resulting in an increase in any rate, is filed with the commission, it may, either upon complaint or upon its own initiative, at once and if it so orders without answer or other formal pleadings by the interested public utility or utilities, but upon reasonable notice, enter upon a hearing concerning the propriety of the rate, classification, contract, practice, or rule. Pending the hearing and the decision thereon the rate, classification,
 contract, practice, or rule shall not go into effect. Except as provided in Section 455.1, the period of suspension of the rate, classification, contract, practice, or rule shall not extend beyond 120 days beyond the time when it would otherwise go into effect unless the commission extends the period of suspension for a further period not exceeding six months. On the hearing the commission shall establish the rates, classifications, contracts, practices, or rules proposed, in whole or in part, or others in lieu thereof, which it finds to be just and reasonable.

All rates, classifications, contracts, practices, or rules not so suspended shall become effective on the expiration of 30 days from the time of filing thereof with the commission or a lesser time as the commission may grant, subject to the power of the commission, after a hearing had on its own motion or upon complaint, to alter or modify them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

455.1.

Whenever a water corporation files with the commission, pursuant to an advice letter submitted in accordance with commission procedures for this means of submission, a schedule stating rates, classifications, contracts, practices, or rules for the service of recycled water, the policies and standards for which are provided for in Article 7 (commencing with Section 13550) of Chapter 7 of Division 7 of the Water Code, the commission shall observe the following procedures:

(a) Unless the commission
 determines, pursuant to subdivision (b), that the schedule filed by a water corporation for the service of recycled water is not justified or, pursuant to subdivision (d), any other party protests in writing the filing of the schedule, the schedule shall become effective upon the expiration of 40 days from the time of filing thereof.

(b) Notwithstanding the filing of notice of changes or amendments as provided in subdivision (c) or a protest as provided in subdivision (d), the schedule as filed shall become effective on an interim basis upon the expiration of 30 days from the time of filing thereof, subject to refund of any amount of the rate subsequently found by the commission to be in excess of a just and reasonable rate.

(c) If, upon its own initiative, the commission, acting through the staff organization with responsibility for reviewing advice letter filings, determines
 that the schedule filed by a water corporation for the service of recycled water is not justified, it shall notify the water corporation of the determination in writing within 40 days from the time of filing of the schedule and shall state in the notice all changes or amendments to the schedule that are required to make it just and reasonable. Upon the refiling by the water corporation within 10 days of the receipt of the notice of a revised schedule incorporating all changes and amendments specified by the commission, the revised schedule shall become effective on an interim basis subject to refund upon the expiration of five days from the time of the refiling thereof, and shall become final upon formal commission action approving the schedule, as revised.

(d) If any other party, including the commission organization or division created pursuant to Section 309.5, protests in writing the schedule filed by a water corporation for the service of
 recycled water, the commission shall set the matter for a hearing on the protest to be held within a reasonable time from the time that the party files its written protest with the commission.

(e) Subdivision (d) of Section 311 shall govern the timing of actions by the commission after the close of the record in any proceeding pursuant to subdivision (d) of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 219.5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

455.2.

(a) The commission shall issue its final decision on a general rate case application of a water corporation with greater than 10,000 service connections in a manner that ensures that the commission’s decision becomes effective on the first day of the first test year in the general rate increase application.

(b) If the commission’s decision is not effective in accordance with subdivision (a), the applicant may file a tariff implementing interim rates that may be increased by an
 amount equal to the rate of inflation as compared to existing rates. The interim rates shall be effective on the first day of the first test year in the general rate case application. These interim rates shall be subject to refund and shall be adjusted upward or downward back to the interim rate effective date, consistent with the final rates adopted by the commission. The commission may authorize a lesser increase in interim rates if the commission finds the rates to be in the public interest. If the presiding officer in the case determines that the commission’s decision cannot become effective on the first day of the first test year due to actions by the water corporation, the presiding officer or commission may require a different effective date for the interim rates or final rates.

(c) The commission shall establish a schedule to require every water corporation subject to the rate case plan for water corporations to file an application
 pursuant to the plan every three years. The plan shall include a provision to allow the filing requirement to be waived upon mutual agreement of the commission and the water corporation.

(d) The requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) may be waived at any time by mutual consent of the executive director of the commission and the water corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1147, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

455.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including, but not limited to Section 454, no later than January 1, 1998, the commission shall adopt rules and regulations that substantially revise the manner in which oil pipeline corporations may change and use rates.

(b) The revised rules and regulations shall adhere to the following criteria:

(1) Pipeline corporations shall be required to give the commission and all
 shippers no less than 30 days’ notice of rate changes.

(2) After the 30-day notice of rate change, pipeline corporations shall be permitted to change rates and use those rates prior to commission approval.

(3) The commission shall have the authority to suspend a rate change and use of the changed rate for a period of time not to exceed 30 days from expiration of the 30-day notice period specified in paragraph (1).

(4) Pipeline corporations shall refund, with interest, any portion of the rate change that is subsequently disallowed by the commission to all shippers within 30 days of the commission’s decision becoming final. Interest shall accrue from the date the new rate is first charged.

(5) Any increase in the shipping rate charged by an oil pipeline
 corporation prior to commission approval shall not exceed 10 percent per 12-month period. The commission shall determine the appropriateness of allowing retroactive charge and collection of subsequently approved rate increases above 10 percent.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that oil pipeline corporations be permitted to use new rates after the period of the suspension of a rate change, if any, by the commission pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) prior to commission approval, provided any disallowed portion of the new rate is fully refunded with interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 802, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

455.5.

(a) In establishing rates for any electrical, gas, heat, or water corporation, the commission may eliminate consideration of the value of any portion of any electric, gas, heat, or water generation or production facility which, after having been placed in service, remains out of service for nine or more consecutive months, and may disallow any expenses related to that facility. Upon eliminating consideration of any portion of a facility or disallowing any expenses related thereto under this section, the commission shall reduce the rates of the corporation accordingly and shall, for accounting
 purposes, record the value of that portion of the facility in a deferred debit account and shall treat this amount similar to the treatment of the allowance for funds used during construction. When that portion of the facility is returned to useful service, as provided in subdivision (c), the corporation may apply to the commission for the inclusion of its value and expenses related to its operation for purposes of the establishment of the corporation’s rates.

(b) Every electrical, gas, heat, and water corporation shall periodically, as required by the commission, report to the commission on the status of any portion of any electric, gas, heat, or water generation or production facility which is out of service and shall immediately notify the commission when any portion of the facility has been out of service for nine consecutive months.

(c) Within 45 days of receiving the
 notification specified in subdivision (b), the commission shall institute an investigation to determine whether to reduce the rates of the corporation to reflect the portion of the electric, gas, heat, or water generation or production facility which is out of service. For purposes of this subdivision, out-of-service periods shall not include planned outages of predetermined duration scheduled in advance.

The commission’s order shall require that rates associated with that facility are subject to refund from the date the order instituting the investigation was issued. The commission shall consolidate the hearing on the investigation with the next general rate proceeding instituted for the corporation.

(d) Upon being informed by the corporation that any portion of its electric, gas, heat, or water generation or production facility which was eliminated from consideration by the commission in establishing
 rates for being out of service for nine or more consecutive months pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), has been restored to service and has achieved at least 100 continuous hours of operation, the commission may again consider that portion of the facility for purposes of establishing rates, and may adjust the corporation’s rates accordingly without a hearing, except that a hearing is required on whether to include, for purposes of establishing rates, any additional plant value added.

(e) Nothing in this section prohibits the commission from reviewing the effects of any electric, gas, heat, or water generation or production facility which has been out of service for less than nine consecutive months or planned outages of predetermined duration scheduled in advance.

(f) For purposes of this section, an electric, gas, heat, or water generation or production facility includes only
 such a facility that the commission determines to be a major facility of the corporation, and does not include any facility determined by the commission to constitute a plant held for future use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 279, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

455.7.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Large electrical corporation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 3280.

(2) “Large gas corporation” means a gas corporation with 250,000 or more customer accounts within the state.

(b) By January 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, each large electrical corporation shall publish on its internet website, and provide to the commission, a visual representation of the cost categories included in residential electric rates for the succeeding calendar year that includes all of the following cost categories:

(1) Costs associated with electrical distribution grid infrastructure, not including costs associated specifically with wildfire mitigation.

(2) Costs associated with wildfire mitigation activities pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 8385) of Division 4.1.

(3) Costs associated with the electrical transmission infrastructure, separating transmission costs in the jurisdiction of the commission from those in the jurisdiction of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

(4) Costs due to energization, including pursuant to Article 14.5 (commencing with Section 931) of Chapter 4.

(5) Costs due to catastrophic events and emergencies.

(6) Costs due to net metering and net billing tariffs, including pursuant to Sections 2827 to 2827.10, inclusive.

(7) Costs due to commodity prices, including natural gas.

(8) Costs due to energy efficiency programs, including programs established pursuant to Sections 379.5, 381, 382, 399.4, and 399.8.

(9) Costs due to insurance, including self-insurance.

(10) Costs due to metering and billing.

(11) Costs due to taxes.

(12) Costs due to unrecovered arrearages.

(13) Any other cost categories, as determined by the commission.

(c) On or before January 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, each large gas corporation shall publish on its internet website, and provide to the commission, a visual representation of the cost categories included in residential gas rates for the succeeding calendar year that includes all of the following cost categories:

(1) Costs associated with gas distribution grid infrastructure.

(2) Costs associated with gas transmission infrastructure, separating transmission costs in the jurisdiction of the commission from those in the jurisdiction of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

(3) Costs due to catastrophic events and emergencies.

(4) Costs due to commodity prices, including natural
 gas.

(5) Costs due to energy efficiency programs, including programs established pursuant to Sections 379.5, 382, and 399.4.

(6) Costs due to insurance.

(7) Costs due to metering and billing.

(8) Costs due to taxes.

(9) Costs due to unrecovered arrearages.

(10) Any other cost categories, as determined by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 762, Sec. 3.   (AB 3264)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

456.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prohibit any public utility from profiting, to the extent permitted by the commission, from any economies, efficiencies, or improvements which it may make, and from distributing by way of dividends, or otherwise disposing of, such profits. The commission may make or permit such arrangement with any public utility as it deems wise for the purpose of encouraging economies, efficiencies, or improvements and securing the public utility making them such portion of the profits thereof as the commission determines.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

458.

(a) No common carrier, or any officer or agent thereof, or any person acting for or employed by it, shall, by means of known false billing, classification, weight, weighing, or report of weight, or by any other device or means assist, suffer, or permit any corporation or person to obtain transportation for any person or property between points within this state at less than the rates and fares then established and in force as shown by the schedules filed and in effect at the time.

No person,
 corporation, or any officer, agent, or employee of a corporation shall, by means of false billing, false or incorrect classification, false weight or weighing, false representation as to contents or substance of a package, or false report or statement of weight, or by any other device or means, whether with or without the consent or connivance of a common carrier or any of its officers, agents, or employees, seek to obtain or obtain such transportation for such property at less than the rates then established and in force therefor.

(b) Subdivision (a) is not applicable to network railroad transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

459.

(a) No person or corporation, or any officer, agent, or employee of a corporation, shall knowingly, directly or indirectly, by any false statement or representation as to cost or value, or the nature or extent of an injury, or by the use of any false billing, bill of lading, receipt, voucher, roll, account, claim, certificate, affidavit, or deposition, or upon any false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement or entry, obtain or attempt to obtain any allowance, rebate, or payment for damage, in connection with or growing out of the transportation
 of persons or property, or an agreement to transport such persons or property, whether with or without the consent or connivance of a common carrier or any of its officers, agents, or employees. No common carrier, or any of its officers, agents, or employees, shall knowingly pay or offer to pay any such allowance, rebate, or claim for damage.

(b) Subdivision (a) is not applicable to network railroad transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

460.3.

(a) The commission shall prohibit any passenger stage corporation from charging any fare to, or imposing any other charge on, any physically disabled or handicapped passenger which is more than the fare or charge imposed on a passenger who is not physically disabled or handicapped for the same transportation or service, and shall approve no schedule of fares or charges which is discriminatory under this section.

(b) Any special provision made by a passenger stage corporation for assisting a physically disabled or handicapped
 person in using its transportation service is, for purposes of subdivision (a), a part of the same transportation or service offered to passengers who are not physically disabled or handicapped, and is not a separate service for which an additional charge may be made. Nothing in this section, however, requires a passenger stage corporation to furnish any equipment or assistance for a physically disabled or handicapped person different from or in addition to that which may be required under any other law.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 460.5 (as added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 794) by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

460.7.

(a) Beginning July 1, 1990, and continuing thereafter, every passenger stage corporation shall file with the commission one of the following:

(1) A certificate of workers’ compensation coverage for its employees issued by an admitted insurer.

(2) A certification of consent to self-insure issued by the Director of Industrial Relations, and the identity of the administrator of the carrier’s workers’ compensation self-insurance plan.

(3) A statement under penalty of perjury, stating that, in its operations as a passenger stage corporation, it does not employ any person in any manner so as to become subject to the workers’ compensation laws of this state.

(b) The workers’ compensation certified to under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be effective until canceled. Cancellation shall require 30 days’ advance notice.

(c) If, after filing the statement described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the corporation becomes subject to the workers’ compensation laws of this state, the corporation shall promptly notify the commission that the corporation is withdrawing its statement under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), and shall simultaneously file the certificate described in either paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a).

(d) The commission may adopt rules and regulations that it determines to be necessary to carry out this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1240, Sec. 1.3.)
-------------------------------------------

461.2.

For purposes of establishing rates for a telephone or telegraph corporation, the commission shall include all revenues and expenses of the corporation from the installation and maintenance of that simple inside wiring which is subject to the order of the Federal Communications Commission deregulating that wiring (CC Docket No. 79-105, FCC 86-63; 51 F.R. 8498, March 12, 1986).

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 400, Sec. 1.   Effective September 3, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

461.5.

(a) (1) No discrimination in charges or facilities for transportation shall be made by any railroad or other transportation company between places or persons, or in the facilities for the transportation of the same classes of freight or passengers within this state. It shall be unlawful for any railroad or other transportation company to charge or receive any greater compensation in the aggregate for the transportation of passengers or of like kind of property for a shorter than for a longer distance over the same line
 or route in the same direction, the shorter being included within the longer distance, or to charge any greater compensation as a through rate than the aggregate of the intermediate rates.

(2) Upon application to the commission company may be authorized by the commission to charge less for longer than for shorter distances for the transportation of persons or property and the commission may from time to time prescribe the extent to which such company may be relieved from the prohibition to charge less for the longer than for the shorter haul. The commission may authorize the issuance of excursion and commutation tickets at special rates.

(3) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prevent the commission from ordering and compelling any railroad or other transportation company to make reparation to any shipper on account of the rates charged to such shipper being
 excessive or discriminatory, provided no discrimination will result from such reparation.

(b) Subdivision (a) is not applicable to network railroad transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

462.

Every street or interurban railroad corporation shall upon such terms as the commission finds to be just and reasonable furnish to its passengers transfers entitling them to one continuous trip in the same general direction over and upon the portions of its lines within the same city or city and county not reached by the originating car.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 795.)
-------------------------------------------

463.

(a) For purposes of establishing rates for any electrical or gas corporation, the commission shall disallow expenses reflecting the direct or indirect costs resulting from any unreasonable error or omission relating to the planning, construction, or operation of any portion of the corporation’s plant which cost, or is estimated to have cost, more than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), including any expenses resulting from delays caused by any unreasonable error or omission. Nothing in this section prohibits a finding by the commission of other unreasonable or imprudent expenses. This
 subdivision is a clarification of the existing authority of the commission, is not intended to limit or restrict any power or authority of the commission conferred by any other provision of law, and applies to all matters pending before the commission. This section does not prohibit the commission from establishing rates for an electrical or gas corporation on a basis other than an allowed rate of return on undepreciated capital costs.

(b) Whenever an electrical or gas corporation fails to prepare or maintain records sufficient to enable the commission to completely evaluate any relevant or potentially relevant issue related to the reasonableness and prudence of any expense relating to the planning, construction, or operation of the corporation’s plant, the commission shall disallow that expense for purposes of establishing rates for the corporation. This subdivision does not apply where the commission determines that a reasonable person could
 not have anticipated either the relevance or potential relevance, to an evaluation of costs incurred on the project, of preparing or maintaining the records or the extent of recordkeeping required to adequately evaluate those costs.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Planning” includes, but is not limited to, activities related to the initial and subsequent assessments of the need for a plant construction project; the selection of contractors and the negotiation of contract provisions; certification; project organization; and site selection, including the investigation and interpretation of environmental factors such as seismic conditions and other external factors affecting the construction, operation, and safety of the plant.

(2) “Construction” includes, but is not limited to, activities related to engineering
 such as the development and use of specifications, drawings, and procedures; the preparation and use of construction plans, including blueprints; procurement activities; repairs, replacement, redesign, or repositioning of equipment and facilities; startup activities; and quality assurance and quality control activities.

(3) “Operation” includes, but is not limited to, activities related to decisions affecting the timing and nature of the use of the plant; dispatch and control activities and decisions; and plant operation, fuel loading, and maintenance. 

(4) “Error” includes, but is not limited to, any action or direction which causes an avoidable (i) increase in the time required to bring the plant to full commercial operation, (ii) change in the number or types of personnel or firms required to bring the plant to full commercial operation, (iii) increase in the number of worker
 hours required to complete any portion of the plant construction project, or (iv) change of equipment, configuration, design, schedule, or program.

(5) “Omission” includes, but is not limited to, any failure to act or to provide direction which causes an avoidable (i) increase in the time required to bring the plant to full commercial operation, (ii) change in the number or types of personnel or firms required to bring the plant to full commercial operation, (iii) increase in the number of worker hours required to complete any portion of the plant construction project, or (iv) change of equipment, configuration, design, schedule, or program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1212, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

463.5.

(a) Section 463 does not require the commission to undertake a reasonableness review of recorded costs to determine the reasonableness of the costs of each item of any electrical or gas corporation’s plant which costs, or is estimated to have cost, more than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) where the commission either has established a maximum reasonable cost pursuant to Section 1005.5 or has adopted an estimate of the reasonable costs in any proceeding.

The establishment of the maximum costs or adoption of an estimated cost does not limit or
 restrict the discretion of the commission in considering the reasonableness of plant-related costs in subsequent proceedings.

(b) This section shall become operative January 1, 1989.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.   Section operative January 1, 1989, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

464.

(a) Reasonable expenditures by transmission owners that are electrical corporations to plan, design, and engineer reconfiguration, replacement, or expansion of transmission facilities are in the public interest and are deemed prudent if made for the purpose of facilitating competition in electric generation markets, ensuring open access and comparable service, or maintaining or enhancing reliability, whether or not these expenditures are for transmission facilities that become operational.

(b) The commission and the Electricity Oversight Board shall jointly facilitate the efforts of the state’s transmission owning electrical corporations to obtain authorization from the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission to recover reasonable expenditures made for the purposes stated in subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in this section alters or affects the recovery of the reasonable costs of other electric facilities in rates pursuant to the commission’s existing ratemaking authority under this code or pursuant to the Federal Power Act (41 Stat. 1063; 16 U.S.C. Secs. 791a, et seq.). The commission may periodically review and adjust depreciation schedules and rates authorized for an electric plant that is under the jurisdiction of the commission and owned by an electrical corporation and periodically review and adjust depreciation schedules and rates authorized for a gas plant that is under
 the jurisdiction of the commission and owned by a gas corporation, consistent with this code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 454.1 (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1040) by Stats. 2004, Ch. 694, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

465.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), whenever any labor of a custodial or janitorial nature is not performed by the employees of a public utility, such labor shall be let out under contract to the lowest responsible bidder with the provision that prevailing wages be a condition of any such contract. For the purposes of this section, “prevailing wages” shall be deemed to include employer payments for health and welfare, pension, holidays, sick leave, vacation, apprenticeship or other training programs.

(b) A public utility shall implement the
 provisions of subdivision (a) by requiring the entity with which it contracts to pay its custodial or janitorial employees the prevailing wage. The public utility awarding the contract shall cause to be inserted in the contract a stipulation that the failure to pay prevailing wages shall be cause for the termination of the contract.

(c) Nothing in this section shall prevent a public utility from employing a custodial or janitorial service for a period of 90 days or less without a contract meeting the requirements of subdivision (a) of this section.

(d) The Director of the Department of Industrial Relations shall determine the prevailing wage for custodial or janitorial employees in accordance with the standards set forth in Section 1773 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 343.)
-------------------------------------------

466.

Pursuant to Section 465, the contractor to whom the contract is awarded and any subcontractor under him shall pay not less than the specified prevailing wage to all workmen performing custodial or janitorial labor in the excecution of the contract.

Each contractor and subcontractor shall keep an accurate payroll record, showing the name, address, social security number, work classification, straight time and overtime hours worked each day and week, and the actual per diem wages paid to each janitorial and custodial worker employed by him in connection with the contract. The contractor’s and
 subcontractor’s payroll records shall be available for inspection at all reasonable hours, and a copy shall be made available upon request to the employee, or his authorized representative, and the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement. After a complaint has been filed with the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement alleging that the contractor or the subcontractor has paid less than the prevailing wage, the contractor or subcontractor shall upon receipt of a written notice from the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement within 10 days file with the public utility and the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement a certified copy of the payroll records.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 343.)
-------------------------------------------

467.

The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement in the Department of Industrial Relations shall enforce Section 466 in the same manner as provided for by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 79) of Division 1 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 343.)
-------------------------------------------

468.

(a) For purposes of this section, “expense incurred by a public utility in assisting or deterring union organizing” means costs incurred in communicating with employees, or employees of the public utility’s contractors, in an effort to persuade them to join or support, or to not join or support, a labor organization.

(b) Any expense incurred by a public utility in assisting or deterring union organizing shall not be recoverable either directly or indirectly in the public utility’s rates and
 shall be borne exclusively by the shareholders of the public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 429, Sec. 1.   (AB 560)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Tariff Schedules [486. - 495.7.]

486.

(a) Every common carrier shall file with the commission and shall print and keep open to the public inspection schedules showing the rates, fares, charges, and classifications for the transportation between termini within this state of persons and property from each point upon its route to all other points thereon; and from each point upon its route to all points upon every other route leased, operated, or controlled by it; and from each point on its route or upon any route leased, operated, or controlled by it to all points upon the route of any other common carrier, whenever a through route and a joint rate has been established or ordered between any two such points. If no joint rate over a through route has been established, the schedules of the several carriers in such through route shall show the separately established rates, fares, charges, and classifications applicable to the through transportation.

(b) Subdivision (a) is not applicable to network railroad transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

487.
